Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.195

Articles of amendment.

The articles of amendment shall be executed in duplicate originals by the corporation by an officer of the corporation, and shall set forth:

(1) The name of the corporation.

(2) Any amendment so adopted.

(3) If an amendment was adopted by the board of directors without being submitted for member or shareholder action, a statement to that effect and that member or shareholder action was not required; or a statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members and shareholders at which the amendment was adopted, that a quorum was present at such meeting, and that such amendment received at least two-thirds of the votes which members or shareholders of the corporation, and of each class entitled to vote thereon as a class, present at such meeting in person, by mail, by electronic transmission, or represented by proxy were entitled to cast, or a statement that such amendment was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members and shareholders entitled to vote with respect thereto.

[ 2001 c 271 s 12; 2000 c 167 s 7; 1982 c 35 s 130; 1981 c 302 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 39.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.